Utah statutes.
7-3-18.   Real estate acquisition, holding, and conveyance.

A bank may purchase, hold, and convey real estate, other than bank premises, only for those purposes and in a manner prescribed by commissioner by regulation. Such regulations may not be more restrictive than the laws and regulations applicable to acquisition and holding of real estate by national banks.

